Illinois, session 104th, HB3195.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The 2-1-1 Service Act is amended by changing 5Sections 5, 10, 20, 30, 45, 55, and 60 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1335/5)7    Sec. 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that the 8implementation of a single, easy to use telephone number, 92-1-1, for public access to information and referral for 10health and human services and information about access to 11services after a natural or non-natural disaster will benefit 12the residents citizens of this State by providing easier 13access to available health and human services, by reducing 14inefficiencies in connecting people with the desired service 15providers, and by reducing duplication of efforts.16(Source: P.A. 96-599, eff. 1-1-10.) 17    (20 ILCS 1335/10)18    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:19    "2-1-1" means the abbreviated dialing code assigned by the 20Federal Communications Commission on July 21, 2000, for 21consumer access to community information and referral 22services.  HB3195- 2 -LRB104 11985 KTG 22079 b1    "Department" means the Department of Human Services.2    "Lead entity" means an Illinois 501(c)(3) non-profit 3agency or organization designated by the Department to manage 4use of the 2-1-1 dialing code for the purpose of providing the 5public access to information about health and human services.6    "Approved 2-1-1 service provider" means a public or 7nonprofit agency or other organization designated by the lead 8entity to provide 2-1-1 services and to be an authorized user 9of the 2-1-1 dialing code in a 2-1-1 service area.10    "2-1-1 service area" means an area of Illinois identified 11by the lead entity as an area within which an approved a 12recognized 2-1-1 service provider is authorized to provide 132-1-1 services.14    "2-1-1 services" means information and referral services 15provided through the use of 2-1-1 and intended to promote and 16provide access to human services, and to aid in disaster 17response and recovery.18    "Recognized 2-1-1 service provider" means an organization 19recognized by the lead entity as an appropriate administrator 20and authorized user of the 2-1-1 dialing code in a 2-1-1 21service area.22    "Human services" means services provided by government, 23nonprofit, or other designated faith-based organizations to 24ensure the health and well-being of Illinois residents. "Human 25services" includes services designed to provide relief or 26assistance after a natural or non-natural disaster.   HB3195- 3 -LRB104 11985 KTG 22079 b1    "Pay telephone" means any coin, coinless, or credit card 2reader telephone, provided that the end user pays or arranges 3to pay for exchange and interexchange, intraMSA, and interMSA 4calls from such instrument on an individual call basis.5    "Private branch exchange" or "PBX" means a private 6telephone system and associated equipment located on the 7user's property that provides communications between stations 8and external networks.9    "Telecommunications carrier" has the same meaning ascribed 10to that term in Section 13-202 of the Public Utilities Act. 11(Source: P.A. 96-599, eff. 1-1-10.) 12    (20 ILCS 1335/20)13    Sec. 20. Designation of lead entity for 2-1-1. 14    (a) Subject to subsection (e) of this Section, the 15Department is authorized to identify, designate, and enter 16into a contract with a lead entity to provide governance and 17oversight, including the ability to design, implement, 18support, and coordinate a State-wide 2-1-1 system.19    (b) Qualifications for designation of the lead entity 20shall include:21        (1) a public or private governance structure with 22    representation from and active collaboration with State 23    health and human service departments, specifically the 24    Department, the Department of Healthcare and Family 25    Services, the Department on Aging, the Department of Human   HB3195- 4 -LRB104 11985 KTG 22079 b1    Rights, the Department of Public Health, the Illinois 2    Emergency Management Agency, the Illinois Commerce 3    Commission, and non-governmental entity stakeholders; 4    non-governmental entity stakeholders shall constitute a 5    minimum of two-thirds of the representatives;6        (2) demonstrated expertise or experience, or both, in 7    planning, supporting, and overseeing administration of for 8    a State-wide information and referral system; and9        (3) demonstrated support from community partners, 10    including local 2-1-1 service providers; .11        (4) demonstrated expertise in providing access to 12    health and human services; and13        (5) a demonstrated track record of securing 14    diversified funding sources, and evidence of existing 15    diversified funding sources, in order to support 16    sustainable operation of 2-1-1.17    (c) The lead entity shall encourage the orderly and 18efficient use of 2-1-1 to:19        (1) provide referrals and access to human services; 20    and21        (2) collect needed information about the demand for 22    human services and the delivery of human services in 23    Illinois.24    (d) The lead entity shall establish standards consistent 25with prevailing national standards established for providing 26information about and referrals to human services agencies to   HB3195- 5 -LRB104 11985 KTG 22079 b12-1-1 callers. The standards shall prescribe the technology or 2manner of delivering 2-1-1 calls and shall not exceed any 3requirements for 2-1-1 systems set by the Federal 4Communications Commission. The standards shall be consistent 5with the Americans with Disabilities Act, ensuring 6accessibility for users of Teletypewriters for the Deaf (TTY). 7    (e) (d) The lead entity shall provide periodic 8programmatic and fiscal reports on activities, 9accomplishments, and other issues to the Department, as 10outlined in Section 60.11    (f) (e) In awarding the contract under subsection (a) of 12this Section, the Department shall ensure that the 2-1-1 lead 13entity has the organizational capacity to carry out the terms 14of the contract and that the contract is cost-neutral to the 15Department. 16(Source: P.A. 96-599, eff. 1-1-10.) 17    (20 ILCS 1335/30)18    Sec. 30. 2-1-1 services. Only a service provider approved 19by the lead entity may provide 2-1-1 telephone services. The 20lead entity shall approve 2-1-1 service providers, after 21considering all of the following:22        (1) the ability of the proposed 2-1-1 service provider 23    to meet the prevailing national 2-1-1 standards; 24    recommended by the Alliance of Information and Referral 25    Systems;   HB3195- 6 -LRB104 11985 KTG 22079 b1        (2) the financial stability and health of the proposed 2    2-1-1 service provider;3        (3) the community support for the proposed 2-1-1 4    service provider;5        (4) the relationships with other information and 6    referral services; and7        (5) any other criteria as the lead entity deems 8    appropriate. 9(Source: P.A. 96-599, eff. 1-1-10.) 10    (20 ILCS 1335/45)11    Sec. 45. Liability of 2-1-1 providers or 12telecommunications carriers. An approved A recognized 2-1-1 13service provider or telecommunications carrier and its 14employees, directors, officers, and agents are not liable to 15any person in a civil action for injuries or loss to persons or 16property as a result of an act, omission, or delay of the 17approved recognized 2-1-1 service provider or 18telecommunications carrier, and its employees, directors, 19officers, or agents, in connection with:20        (1) developing, adopting, implementing, maintaining, 21    or operating a 2-1-1 system;22        (2) making 2-1-1 available for use by the public; or23        (3) providing 2-1-1 services;24except for injuries or loss resulting from the willful or 25wanton misconduct of the 2-1-1 service provider or   HB3195- 7 -LRB104 11985 KTG 22079 b1telecommunications carrier and its employees, directors, 2officers, or agents. 3(Source: P.A. 96-599, eff. 1-1-10.) 4    (20 ILCS 1335/55)5    Sec. 55. Use of moneys for projects and activities in 6support of 2-1-1-eligible activities. 7    (a) The lead entity shall study, design, implement, 8support, coordinate, and evaluate a State-wide 2-1-1 system.9    (b) Activities eligible for assistance from the 2-1-1 10Account Fund include, but are not limited to:11        (1) Creating a structure for a State-wide 2-1-1 12    resources database that will meet prevailing national the 13    Alliance for Information and Referral Systems standards 14    for information and referral systems databases and that 15    will be integrated with local resources databases 16    maintained by approved 2-1-1 service providers.17        (2) Developing a State-wide resources database for the 18    2-1-1 system.19        (3) Maintaining public information available from 20    State agencies, departments, and programs that provide 21    health and human services for access by 2-1-1 service 22    providers.23        (4) Providing grants to approved 2-1-1 service 24    providers to design, develop, and implement 2-1-1 for 25    their its 2-1-1 service areas area.  HB3195- 8 -LRB104 11985 KTG 22079 b1        (5) Providing grants to approved 2-1-1 service 2    providers to enable 2-1-1 service providers to provide and 3    evaluate 2-1-1 service delivery on an ongoing basis.4        (6) Providing grants to approved 2-1-1 service 5    providers to enable the provision of 2-1-1 services on a 6    24-hours per-day, 7-days per-week basis. 7(Source: P.A. 96-599, eff. 1-1-10.) 8    (20 ILCS 1335/60)9    Sec. 60. Annual reports. The lead entity shall provide an 10initial report to the Department within 6 months after the 11effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 12Assembly. Thereafter, the lead entity shall provide a report 13to the Department on a regular basis as required in its 14contract with the Department, at minimum annually. The report 15shall include, at minimum, information on the following:16        (1) Call volume and interactions. The total number of 17    inquiries, including calls, chats, texts, or web 18    inquiries, along with trends in monthly, quarterly, and 19    annual call volumes, and average response times for 20    handling inquiries.21        (2) Caller demographics. The demographic information 22    of callers, including age, gender, and location, and any 23    other relevant identifiers, highlighting any notable 24    shifts or patterns in demographic data over time.25        (3) Reasons for contact. A breakdown of inquiries by   HB3195- 9 -LRB104 11985 KTG 22079 b1    category or type of referral request, including the demand 2    for, and need for, human services.3        (4) Referrals made and service outcomes. The total 4    number of referrals made, specifying the programs or 5    services to which clients were referred    .6        (5) Service referral gaps. The total number of 7    requests for services or programs for which referral to an 8    existing service provider is not able to be made, 9    including description of services requested.10        (6) Service providers and coverage rates. The 11    percentage of statewide coverage reached, noting any 12    regions that lack adequate coverage.13        (7) Trends and comparisons. Year-over-year trends of 14    the data outlined in paragraphs (1) through (6).15The lead entity shall provide an annual report to the General 16Assembly and the Department beginning in calendar year 2010.17(Source: P.A. 96-599, eff. 1-1-10.) 18    Section 10. The Human Services 2-1-1 Collaboration Board 19Act is amended by changing Section 90 as follows: 20    (20 ILCS 3956/90)21    (For Act repeal see Section 90)22    Sec. 90. Repealer. This Act is repealed on July 1, 2025. 23upon designation by the Secretary of Human Services that a 24lead entity is under contract with the Department of Human   HB3195- 10 -LRB104 11985 KTG 22079 b1Services to carry out the provisions of the 2-1-1 Service Act. 2The Secretary shall designate that a lead entity is under 3contract with the Department of Human Services to carry out 4the provisions of the 2-1-1 Service Act by filing a statement 5with the Index Department of the Secretary of State.6(Source: P.A. 96-599, eff. 1-1-10.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.